sv: Kompatibel skridskoåkningstyp: Dubbelblad; Konståkning; Ishockey; Inlines; Fritidsåkning; Roller derby; Hastighetsåkning; Långfärdsåkning; Universell; Övrigt
th: ประเภทการเล่นสเก็ตที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ใบมีดคู่; ฟิกเกอร์สเกต; ฮอกกี้; อินไลน์สเกต; สเกตเพื่อการพักผ่อน; โรลเลอร์ดาร์บี้; สปีดสเกต; ทัวร์ริง; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Združljiva drsalna disciplina: Dvojno rezilo; Umetnostno drsanje; Hokej; Rolanje; Rekreativno drsanje; Roller derby; Hitrostno drsanje; Turno drsanje; Univerzalno; Drugo
ko: 호환 스케이팅 종목: 더블 블레이드; 피겨 스케이팅; 하키; 인라인 스케이팅; 레크리에이셔널 스케이팅; 롤러 더비; 스피드 스케이팅; 투어링; 범용; 기타
ro-RO: Disciplină de patinaj compatibilă: Lamă dublă; Patinaj artistic; Hochei; Patinaj pe role; Patinaj de agrement; Roller derby; Patinaj viteză; Touring; Universal; Altele
cs: Kompatibilní bruslařská disciplína: Dvojitý nůž; Krasobruslení; Hokej; Jízda na kolečkových bruslích; Rekreační bruslení; Roller derby; Rychlobruslení; Turistika; Univerzální; Jiné
es: Disciplina de patinaje compatible: Cuchilla doble; Patinaje artístico; Hockey; Patinaje en línea; Patinaje recreativo; Roller derby; Patinaje de velocidad; Turismo; Universal; Otro
pl: Zgodna dyscyplina łyżwiarska: Płoza podwójna; Łyżwiarstwo figurowe; Hokej; Rolkarstwo; Jazda rekreacyjna; Roller derby; Łyżwiarstwo szybkie; Jazda turystyczna; Uniwersalne; Inne
lt-LT: Suderinama čiuožimo disciplina: Dvigubi ašmenys; Dailusis čiuožimas; Ledo ritulys; Važiavimas vienaeiliais riedučiais; Pramoginis čiuožimas; Riedučių derbis; Greitasis čiuožimas; Žygiai; Universalus; Kita
zh-TW: 相容滑冰項目: 雙刃冰刀; 花式滑冰; 曲棍球; 直排輪; 休閒滑冰; 滑輪德比; 競速滑冰; 長途滑冰; 通用; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместимост с дисциплината на кънки: Двойно острие; Фигурно пързаляне; Хокей; Каране на ролери; Любителско пързаляне; Ролер дерби; Бързо пързаляне; Туринг; Универсална; Друга
nb: Kompatibel skatedisiplin: Dobbeltblad; Kunstløp; Hockey; Inlineskøyter; Turskøyter; Roller derby; Hurtigløp; Tur; Universell; Annet
tr: Uyumlu paten disiplini: Çift bıçak; Artistik patinaj; Hokey; Tek sıra tekerlekli paten; Hobi amaçlı paten; Roller derby; Sürat pateni; Tur; Evrensel; Diğer
pt-PT: Disciplina de patinagem compatível: Lâmina dupla; Patinagem artística; Hóquei; Patinagem em linha; Patinagem de recreio; Roller derby; Patinagem de velocidade; Passeio; Universal; Outra
da: Kompatibel skøjtedisciplin: Dobbeltklinge; Kunstskøjteløb; Hockey; Rulleskøjteløb; Motionsskøjteløb; Roller derby; Hurtigløb på skøjter; Turskøjteløb; Universal; Andet
ja: 対応スケート競技: ダブルブレード; フィギュアスケート; ホッケー; インラインスケート; レクリエーショナルスケート; ローラーダービー; スピードスケート; ツーリング; ユニバーサル; その他
pt-BR: Modalidade de patinação compatível: Lâmina dupla; Patinação artística; Hóquei; Patinação in-line; Patinação recreacional; Roller derby; Patinação de velocidade; Turismo; Universal; Outro
de: Kompatible Eislaufdisziplin: Doppelkufe; Eiskunstlauf; Eishockey; Inlineskating; Freizeitskating; Roller Derby; Speedskating; Tourenskating; Universal; Sonstige
vi: Bộ môn trượt băng tương thích: Trượt băng hai lưỡi (Double blade); Trượt băng nghệ thuật; Khúc côn cầu; Trượt patin một hàng bánh; Trượt băng giải trí; Trượt patin tốc độ (Roller derby); Trượt băng tốc độ; Trượt băng đường dài; Đa năng; Khác
zh-CN: 适用滑冰项目: 双刀; 花样滑冰; 冰球; 直排轮滑; 休闲滑冰; 轮滑阻拦赛; 速度滑冰; 巡回滑冰; 通用; 其他
en: Compatible skating discipline: Double blade; Figure skating; Hockey; Inline skating; Recreational skating; Roller derby; Speed skating; Touring; Universal; Other
el: Συμβατή κατηγορία πατινάζ: Διπλή λεπίδα; Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ; Χόκεϊ; Πατινάζ inline; Πατινάζ αναψυχής; Roller derby; Πατινάζ ταχύτητας; Περιήγησης; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
hu: Kompatibilis korcsolyázási szakág: Kétpengés; Műkorcsolya; Jégkorong; Görkorcsolyázás; Szabadidős korcsolyázás; Roller derby; Gyorskorcsolya; Túra; Univerzális; Egyéb
nl: Compatibele schaatsdiscipline: Dubbele ijzers; Kunstschaatsen; IJshockey; Inline skaten; Recreatief schaatsen; Roller derby; Snelschaatsen; Toerschaatsen; Universeel; Overige
hr-HR: Kompatibilna disciplina klizanja/rolanja: Dvostruka oštrica; Umjetničko klizanje; Hokej; Rolanje; Rekreativno klizanje; Roller derby; Brzo klizanje; Turno klizanje; Univerzalno; Ostalo
sk-SK: Kompatibilná korčuliarska disciplína: Dvojité nože; Krasokorčuľovanie; Hokej; Kolieskové korčuľovanie; Rekreačné korčuľovanie; Roller derby; Rýchlokorčuľovanie; Turistika; Univerzálne; Iné
fr: Discipline de patinage compatible: Lame double; Patinage artistique; Hockey; Patinage en ligne; Patinage de loisir; Roller derby; Patinage de vitesse; Randonnée; Universel; Autre
fi: Yhteensopiva luistelulaji: Kaksiteräinen; Taitoluistelu; Jääkiekko; Rullaluistelu; Harrasteluistelu; Roller derby; Pikaluistelu; Retkiluistelu; Universaali; Muu
it: Disciplina di pattinaggio compatibile: Doppia lama; Pattinaggio di figura; Hockey; Pattinaggio in linea; Pattinaggio amatoriale; Roller derby; Pattinaggio di velocità; Turismo; Universale; Altro
ru: Совместимая дисциплина катания: Двухполозные; Фигурное катание; Хоккей; Катание на роликах; Любительское катание; Роллер-дерби; Конькобежный спорт; Туринг; Универсальный; Другое